Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2,230
Application to existing domestic
corporations.

(MBCA
17.01) The Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act applies to all domestic
corporations in existence on January 1, 2016, that were incorporated under
any general statute of this state providing for incorporation of corporations
for profit if power to amend or repeal the statute under which the corporation
was incorporated was reserved.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 230.
January 1, 2017